Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-116] Nonforfeiture benefits.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a long-term care insurance policy
shall not be delivered or issued for delivery in this State unless the
policyholder or certificate holder has been offered an option to purchase a
policy or certificate that includes a nonforfeiture benefit. The offer of a
nonforfeiture benefit may be in the form of a rider that is attached to the
policy. If the policyholder or certificate holder declines the nonforfeiture
benefit, the insurer shall provide a contingent benefit upon lapse that shall
be available for a specified period of time following a substantial increase in
premium rates.

(b) For a group long-term care insurance
policy, the offer of a nonforfeiture benefit under subsection (a) shall be made
to the group policyholder. However, if the policy is issued as a group
long-term care insurance, other than to a continuing care retirement community
or other similar entity, the offering shall be made to each proposed certificate
holder.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules to
specify the type of nonforfeiture benefits to be offered as part of long-term
care insurance policies or certificates, the standards for nonforfeiture
benefits, and the rules for contingent benefit upon lapse, including a
determination of the specified period of time during which a contingent benefit
upon lapse shall be available and the substantial premium rate increase that
triggers a contingent benefit upon lapse as provided in subsection (a). [L 1999,
c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next